Yamls/N-mu_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
# The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-10
  
  Noun - му: # Nouns in vowels, inanimate noun, full paradigm 'soil, country / multa, maa / земля, страна'
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom: му
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc: му
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen: мулӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl: мулісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat: мулӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins: муӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com: мукӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car: мутӧг
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns: мула
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr: муся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine: муын
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela: муись
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill: муӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr: мулань
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr: мусянь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl: муӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI: муӧдз
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII: муви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne: муланьын
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla: муланись
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll: муланьӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr: муланьсянь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl: муланьӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI: муланьӧдз
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII: муланьви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: муӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: муӧлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: муӧлісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: муӧлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: муӧс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: мунам
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com+PxSg1: муӧкӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [муӧтӧг, мутӧгьям]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: муӧла
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: муӧся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: муам
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: мусим
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: муам
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [муӧлань, муланям]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [муӧсянь, мусяням]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [муӧттям, муӧттим]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [муӧдззам, муӧдззим]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: муӧви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: муланям
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: муланьсим
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: муланям
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [муланьсяням, муӧланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [муланьӧттям, муланьӧттим, муӧланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [муланьӧдззам, муланьӧдззим, муӧланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: муӧланьви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: муыт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: муытлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: муытлісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: муытлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мутӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: мунат
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com+PxSg2: муыткӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [муыттӧг, мутӧгьят]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: муытла
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: муытся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: муат
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: мусит
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: муат
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [муытлань, муланят]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [муытсянь, мусянят]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [муӧттят, муӧттит]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [муӧдззат, муӧдззит]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: муытви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: муланят
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: муланьсит
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: муланят
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [муланьсянят, муытланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [муланьӧттят, муланьӧттит, муытланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [муланьӧдззат, муланьӧдззит, муытланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: муытланьви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: муыс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: муыслӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: муыслісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: муыслӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мусӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: мунас
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com+PxSg3: муыскӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [муыстӧг, мутӧгьяс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: муысла
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: муысся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: муас
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: мусис
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: муас
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [муыслань, муланяс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [муыссянь, мусяняс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [муӧттяс, муӧттис]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [муӧдззас, муӧдззис]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: муысви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: муланяс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: муланьсис
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: муланяс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [муланьсяняс, муысланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [муланьӧттяc, муланьӧттиc, муысланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [муланьӧдззаc, муланьӧдззиc, муысланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: муысланьви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: муным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мунымлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: мунымлісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: мунымлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мунымӧс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: мунаным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com+PxPl1: мунымкӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [мунымтӧг, мутӧгьяным]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: мунымла
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: мунымся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: муаным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: мусиным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: муаным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [мунымлань, муланяным]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [мунымсянь, мусяняным]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [муӧттяным, муӧттиным]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [муӧдззаным, муӧдззиным]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: мунымви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: муланяным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: муланьсиным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: муланяным
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [муланьсяняным, мунымланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [муланьӧттяным, муланьӧттиным, мунымланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [муланьӧдззаным, муланьӧдззиным,  мунымланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: мунымланьви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: муныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мунытлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: мунытлісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мунытлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мунытӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: мунаныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com+PxPl2: муныткӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [муныттӧг, мутӧгьяныт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: мунытла
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: мунытся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: муаныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: мусиныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: муаныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [мунытлань, муланяныт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [мунытсянь, мусяняныт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [муӧттяныт, муӧттиныт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [муӧдззаныт, муӧдззиныт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: мунытви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: муланяныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: муланьсиныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: муланяныт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [муланьсяняныт, мунытланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [муланьӧттяныт, муланьӧттиныт, мунытланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [муланьӧдззаныт, муланьӧдззиныт, мунытланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: мунытланьви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: муныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: муныслӧн
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: муныслісь
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: муныслӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мунысӧ
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: мунаныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Com+PxPl3: муныскӧт
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [муныстӧг, мутӧгьяныс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: мунысла
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: мунысся
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: муаныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: мусиныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: муаныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [муныслань, муланяныс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [муныссянь, мусяняныс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [муӧттяныс, муӧттиныс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [муӧдззаныс, муӧдззиныс]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: мунысви
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: муланяныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: муланьсиныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: муланяныс
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [муланьсяняныс, мунысланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [муланьӧттяныс, муланьӧттиныс, мунысланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [муланьӧдззаныс, муланьӧдззиныс, мунысланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: мунысланьви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom: муэз
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc: муэз
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen: муэзлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl: муэзлісь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat: муэзлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins: муэзӧн
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com: муэзкӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car: муэзтӧг
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns: муэзла
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr: муэзся
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine: муэзын
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela: муэзісь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill: муэзӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr: муэзлань
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr: муэзсянь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl: муэзӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI: муэзӧдз
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII: муэзви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne: муэзланьын
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla: муэзланись
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll: муэзланьӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr: муэзланьсянь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl: муэзланьӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI: муэзланьӧдз
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII: муэзланьви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: муэзӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: муэзӧлӧн
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: муэзӧлісь
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: муэзӧлӧ
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: муэзӧс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: муэзнам
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxSg1: муэзӧкӧт
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [муэзӧтӧг, муэзтӧгьям]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: муэзӧла
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: муэзӧся
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: муэзам
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [муэзсим, муэсим]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: муэзам
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [муэзӧлань, муэзланям]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [муэзӧсянь, муэзсяням]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [муэзӧттям, муэзӧттим]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [муэзӧдззам, муэзӧдззим]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: муэзӧви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: муэзланям
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: муэзланьсим
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: муэзланям
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [муэзланьсяням, муэзӧланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [муэзланьӧттям, муэзланьӧттим, муэзӧланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [муэзланьӧдззам, муэзланьӧдззим, муэзӧланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: муэзӧланьви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [муэт, муэзыт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [муэтлӧн, муэзытлӧн]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [муэтлісь, муэзытлісь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [муэтлӧ, муэзытлӧ]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [муэтӧ, муэзтӧ]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: муэзнат
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [муэткӧт, муэзыткӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [муэттӧг, муэзыттӧг, муэзтӧгьят]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [муэтла, муэзытла]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [муэтся, муэзытся]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: муэзат
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [муэзсит, муэсит]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: муэзат
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [муэтлань, муэзытлань, муэзланят]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [муэтсянь, муэзытсянь, муэзсянят]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [муэзӧттят, муэзӧттит]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [муэзӧдззат, муэзӧдззит]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [муэтви, муэзытви]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: муэзланят
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: муэзланьсит
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: муэзланят
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [муэзланьсянят, муэтланьсянь, муэзытланьсянь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [муэзланьӧттят, муэзланьӧттит, муэтланьӧт, муэзытланьӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [муэзланьӧдззат, муэзланьӧдззит, муэтланьӧдз, муэзытланьӧдз]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [муэтланьви, муэзытланьви]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [муэс, муэзыс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [муэслӧн, муэзыслӧн]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [муэслісь, муэзыслісь]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [муэслӧ, муэзыслӧ]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [муэсӧ, муэзсӧ]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: муэзнас
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [муэскӧт, муэзыскӧт]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [муэстӧг, муэзыстӧг, муэзтӧгьяс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [муэсла, муэзысла]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [муэсся, муэзысся]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: муэзас
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [муэзсис, муэсис]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: муэзас
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [муэслань, муэзыслань, муэзланяс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [муэссянь, муэзыссянь, муэзсяняс]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [муэзӧттяс, муэзӧттис]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [муэзӧдззас, муэзӧдззис]
     му+N+Inan+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: муэсви
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: муэзланяс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: муэзланьсис
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: муэзланяс
     му+N+Inan+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [муэзланьсяняс, муэсланьсянь, муэзысланьсянь]
